Montana, session 2025, HB313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Definitions. For the purposes of [sections 1 through 8], unless otherwise
provided, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Local government" means a county, city, town, township, school district, TRIBAL GOVERNMENT,
or other district or local public entity with the authority to spend or receive public funds.
(2) "Nonprofit organization" means a nonprofit corporation exempt from taxation under the
provisions of section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3).
(3) (a) "Public swimming pool" means an artificial pool and related appurtenances for swimming,
bathing, wading, or other aquatic therapy or recreation, including but not limited to natural hot water pools,
spas, splash decks, water slides, lazy rivers, and wave pools.
(b) The term does not include:
(i) swimming pools located on private property, including the private common area property of
owner-occupied condominium developments, used for swimming or bathing only by the owner, members of the
owner's family, or their invited guests; or
(ii) medicinal hot water baths for individual use.

- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 313

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0313.5
NEW SECTION. Section 2. Public swimming pool infrastructure account -- use. (1) There is a
public swimming pool infrastructure account within the state special revenue fund provided for in 17-2-102 to
provide grant funding to nonprofit organizations and local governments that operate public swimming pools and
for administrative costs related to administering the grants. The department of commerce shall administer the
account.
(2) Up to 3% of the funds appropriated in [section 8] may be allocated for the department of
commerce's administrative costs.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Public swimming pool infrastructure grants authorization. (1) The
department of commerce is authorized to make up to $5 million in grants to nonprofit organizations and local
governments for property acquisition, construction, space acquisition, remodeling, repairs, and the purchase of
appliances and equipment, AND OPERATIONAL COSTS related to a public swimming pool. GRANT FUNDING USED
FOR OPERATIONAL COSTS IS LIMITED TO PAYING FOR OPERATIONAL COSTS, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO STAFFING,
UTILITIES, AND INSURANCE, FOR UP TO 1 YEAR WITHIN THE FIRST 5 YEARS OF OPERATION OF THE PUBLIC SWIMMING
POOL. The grants authorized in this section are subject to the conditions set forth in [section 5].
(2) The department of commerce shall receive proposals from nonprofit organizations and local
governments for public swimming pool infrastructure projects.
(3) Funding for projects may be provided only as long as there are sufficient funds available from
the amount that was deposited or transferred in the public swimming pool infrastructure account for grants
established in [section 2]. Funding for these projects must be made available in the order that the grant
recipients satisfy the conditions as described in [section 5].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Eligibility -- submission deadline -- priority -- guidelines. (1) A
nonprofit organization or local government may apply to the department of commerce for public swimming
pools infrastructure grants under [section 3].
(2) Nonprofit organizations and local governments shall submit grant applications to the
department of commerce in order to be eligible for funding under [section 3].
(3) The department of commerce is authorized to adopt guidelines necessary to implement
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 313

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0313.5
[sections 3 through 6].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Condition of grants -- disbursement of funds. (1) The disbursement of
grant funds for the projects chosen by the department of commerce pursuant to [section 3] is subject to the
following conditions:
(a) for grants in an amount of $25,000 or more, the grant recipient shall document the availability
of matching funds or in-kind contribution of assets with an appraised value from private sources representing at
least $1 in value for each $5 $1 of the grant;
(b) the grant recipient shall execute a grant agreement with the department of commerce that
includes a project management plan and reporting requirements to track the outcomes of allocated grants; and
(c) the grant recipient shall satisfy other specific requirements considered necessary by the
department of commerce to accomplish the purpose of the project as evidenced by the application to the
department of commerce.
(2) Projects must adhere to the design standards required by applicable regulations. Recipients of
program funds for projects that are not subject to any design standards must comply with generally accepted
industry standards.
(3) If actual project expenses are lower than the projected expense of the project, the department
of commerce shall reduce the amount of grant funds to be provided to grant recipients.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Maximum state funding available -- for each project -- for each
county. (1) The amount of state funding allocated to entities within an individual county under [sections 3
through 5] may not exceed $1 million. No more than two applications may be funded in any one county.
(2) The amount of a grant to a single project may not exceed $500,000.

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Transfer of funds. By July 15, 2025, the state treasurer shall transfer $5
million from the general fund CAPITAL DEVELOPMENTS LONG-RANGE BUILDING PROGRAM ACCOUNT PROVIDED FOR IN
17-7-209 to the public swimming pool infrastructure account established in [section 2].

- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 313

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0313.5
NEW SECTION. Section 8. Appropriation. There is appropriated $5 million from the public
swimming pool infrastructure account established in [section 2] to the department of commerce for grants
authorized in [sections 3 through 6] for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025. This appropriation is authorized to
continue through the biennium beginning July 1, 2027.

NEW SECTION. SECTION 9. NOTIFICATION TO TRIBAL GOVERNMENTS. THE SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL
SEND A COPY OF [THIS ACT] TO EACH FEDERALLY RECOGNIZED TRIBAL GOVERNMENT IN MONTANA.

NEW SECTION. Section 10. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Section 11. Termination. [This act] terminates June 30, 2029.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 313